Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Comprehensive assessment. new text begin (a) new text end A comprehensive assessment of the client's substance use disorder must be administered face-to-face deleted text begin by an alcohol and drug counselordeleted text end within five calendar days from the day of service initiation for a residential program or by the end of the fifth day on which a treatment service is provided in a nonresidential program. The number of days to complete the comprehensive assessment excludes the day of service initiation. deleted text begin If the comprehensive assessment is not completed within the required time frame, the person-centered reason for the delay and the planned completion date must be documented in the client's file. The comprehensive assessment is complete upon a qualified staff member's dated signature. If the client received a comprehensive assessment that authorized the treatment service, an alcohol and drug counselor may use the comprehensive assessment for requirements of this subdivision but must document a review of the comprehensive assessment and update the comprehensive assessment as clinically necessary to ensure compliance with this subdivision within applicable timelines. An alcohol and drug counselor must sign and date the comprehensive assessment review and update.deleted text end new text begin (b) A comprehensive assessment must be administered by: new text end new text begin (1) an alcohol and drug counselor; new text end new text begin (2) a mental health professional who meets the qualifications under section 245I.04, subdivision 2, practices within the scope of their professional licensure, and has training in addiction, co-occurring disorders, and substance use disorder diagnosis and treatment according to the requirements in section 245G.13, subdivision 2, paragraph (f); new text end new text begin (3) a clinical trainee who meets the qualifications under section 245I.04, subdivision 6, practicing under the supervision of a mental health professional who meets the requirements of clause (2); or new text end new text begin (4) a licensed registered nurse as defined in section 148.171, subdivision 20, who practices within the scope of their professional licensure and has training in addiction, co-occurring disorders, and substance use disorder diagnosis and treatment according to the requirements in section 245G.13, subdivision 2, paragraph (f). new text end new text begin (c) If the comprehensive assessment is not completed within the required time frame, the person-centered reason for the delay and the planned completion date must be documented in the client's file. The comprehensive assessment is complete upon a qualified staff member's dated signature. If the client received a comprehensive assessment that authorized the treatment service, an alcohol and drug counselor may use the comprehensive assessment to meet the requirements of this subdivision but must document a review of the comprehensive assessment and update the comprehensive assessment as clinically necessary to ensure compliance with this subdivision within applicable timelines. A staff member qualified under paragraph (b) must sign and date the comprehensive assessment review and update. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.11, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Treatment coordination provider qualifications. (a) Treatment coordination must be provided by qualified staff. An individual is qualified to provide treatment coordination if the individual meets the qualifications of an alcohol and drug counselor under subdivision 5 or if the individual: (1) is skilled in the process of identifying and assessing a wide range of client needs; (2) is knowledgeable about local community resources and how to use those resources for the benefit of the client; (3) has deleted text begin successfullydeleted text end completed deleted text begin 30 hours of classroom instruction on treatment coordination for an individual with substance use disorderdeleted text end new text begin specific training on substance use disorder and co-occurring disorders that is consistent with national evidence-based practicesnew text end ;new text begin andnew text end (4) deleted text begin has eitherdeleted text end new text begin meets one of the following criterianew text end : (i) new text begin has new text end a bachelor's degree in one of the behavioral sciences or related fieldsnew text begin and at least 1,000 hours of supervised experience working with individuals with substance use disordernew text end ; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (ii)new text begin hasnew text end current certification as an alcohol and drug counselor, level I, by the Upper Midwest Indian Council on Addictive Disorders; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ornew text end new text begin (iii) is a mental health practitioner who meets the qualifications under section 245I.04, subdivision 4. new text end deleted text begin (5) has at least 2,000 hours of supervised experience working with individuals with substance use disorder. deleted text end (b) A treatment coordinator must receive at least one hour of supervision regarding individual service delivery from an alcohol and drug counselor, or a mental health professional who has substance use treatment and assessments within the scope of their practice, on a monthly basis. Sec. 3. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT STAFF REPORT AND RECOMMENDATIONS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of human services must, in consultation with the Board of Nursing, Board of Behavioral Health and Therapy, and Board of Medical Practice, conduct a study and develop recommendations to the legislature for amendments to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 245G, that would eliminate any limitations on licensed health professionals' ability to provide substance use disorder treatment services while practicing within their licensed or statutory scopes of practice. The commissioner must submit a report on the study and recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services finance and policy by January 15, 2027. new text end